Utah statutes.
17-20-5.   Report of election and appointment of officers.
Within 10 days after a county clerk issues a certificate of election or a
certificate of appointment made to fill vacancies in elective county offices,
the county clerk shall prepare and forward to the lieutenant governor a
certified report showing:
(1)  the name of the county;
(2)  the name of the county office to which the person was elected or
appointed;
(3)  the date of the election or appointment of the person;
(4)  the date of the expiration of the term for which the person was elected
or appointed;
(5)  the date of the certificate of election or appointment; and
(6)  the date of the qualification of the person elected or appointed.
